Utah statutes.
10-5-129.   Annual financial report.
(1)  Within 180 days after the close of each fiscal year the town clerk or
other delegated person shall present to the council an annual financial
report.
(2)  The requirement under Subsection (1) to present an annual financial
report may be satisfied by an audit report or  annual financial report of an
independent auditor.
